District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

25-1009

Operation of locomotive, streetcar, elevator, or horse-drawn vehicle by intoxicated person prohibited.

Repealed.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 333, ch. 4, § 27
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 455(a), 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-248, § 8(a), 44 DCR 1242
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Oct. 26, 2001, D.C. Law 14-42, § 6(i), 48 DCR 7612
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-266, § 302, 59 DCR 12957

History

Banks organized under federal law, application of law, see § 26-710.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 25-1009.
1973 Ed., § 25-127.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 14-42 validated the previously made technical correction in subsec. (c).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary amendment of section, see § 8(a) of the Boating While Intoxicated Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-346, August 8, 1996, 43 DCR 4621), § 8(a) of the Boating While Intoxicated Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-411, October 28, 1996, 43 DCR 6063), and § 8(a) of the Boating While Intoxicated Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-469, December 30, 1996, 44 DCR 179), and § 8(a) of the Boating While Intoxicated Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-52, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2204).
For temporary addition of a new subchapter, consisting of §§ 25-127a.1 through 25-127a.6, see § 2-7 of the Boating While Intoxicated Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-52, March 31, 1997, 44 DCR 2204).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6(i) of Technical Amendments Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-108, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7622).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 302 of Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-429, July 30, 2012, 59 DCR 9387).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C Act 19-508, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 13325).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-3, January 29, 2013, 60 DCR 2762, 20 DCSTAT 410).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 302 of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Testing Program Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-51, April 17, 2013, 60 DCR 6344, 20 DCSTAT 1360).

Emergency Legislation

For present law, see §§ 50-1901, 50-2201.02, and 50-2206.01.

Editor's Notes